Hawaii statutes.
[§11-363] Other contributions and
expenditures. (a) Expenditures or disbursements for electioneering
communications as defined in section 11-341, or any other coordinated activity
made by any person for the benefit of a candidate in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a candidate
committee, or their agents, shall be considered to be a contribution to the
candidate and expenditure by the candidate.

The financing by any person of the
dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or in part, of any
broadcast or any written or other campaign materials prepared by the candidate,
candidate committee, or agents shall be considered to be a contribution to the
candidate.

This subsection shall not apply to candidates
for governor or lieutenant governor supporting a co-candidate in the general
election.

(b) "Coordinated activity" means:

(1) The payment by any person in cooperation,
consultation, or concert with, at the request of, or pursuant to, any general
or particular understanding with a candidate, candidate committee, the party of
a candidate, or an agent of a candidate, candidate committee, or the party of a
candidate;

(2) The payment by any person for the production,
dissemination, distribution, or republication of any written, graphic, or other
form of campaign material, in whole or in part, prepared by a candidate,
candidate committee, or noncandidate committee, or an agent of a candidate,
candidate committee, or noncandidate committee; or

(3) Any payment by any person or contract for any
electioneering communication, as defined in section 11-341, where the payment
is coordinated with a candidate, candidate committee, the party of the candidate,
or an agent of a candidate, candidate committee, or the party of the candidate.

(c) No expenditure for a candidate who files
an affidavit with the commission agreeing to limit aggregate expenditures by
the candidate, including coordinated activity by any person, shall be made or
incurred by a candidate committee or noncandidate committee without
authorization of the candidate or the candidate's authorized representative.
Every expenditure so authorized and made or incurred shall be attributed to the
candidate with whom the candidate committee or noncandidate committee is
directly associated for the purpose of imposing the expenditure limitations set
forth in section 11-423. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next